Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF2413.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 6178SV (2) 91 jda/jh S.F. 2413 Section 1. Section 256E.7, subsection 2, paragraph h, Code 1 2026, is amended by adding the following new subparagraph: 2 NEW SUBPARAGRAPH . (02) The educational standards of 3 section 256.11, subsection 4, paragraph âaâ , subparagraph (2), 4 relating to the social studies curriculum for grades seven and 5 eight. 6 Sec. 2. Section 256F.4, subsection 2, Code 2026, is amended 7 by adding the following new paragraph: 8 NEW PARAGRAPH . 0u. Be subject to and comply with the 9 requirements of section 256.11, subsection 4, paragraph âaâ , 10 subparagraph (2), relating to the social studies curriculum for 11 grades seven and eight in the same manner as a school district. 12 Sec. 3. Section 256.11, subsection 4, paragraph a, 13 subparagraph (2), Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 14 (2) Social studies, including instruction related to civics 15 and United States government . The instruction related to 16 civics and United States government shall be at least one-half 17 semester, or the trimester or quarter equivalent, during grade 18 seven and grade eight. 19 Sec. 4. APPLICABILITY. This Act applies to school years 20 beginning on or after July 1, 2028. 21